Illinois, session 104th, HB3907.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary and 7contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging for 8the Fiscal Year Ending June 30, 2025:9OFFICE OF THE DIRECTOR10Payable from the General Revenue Fund:11  For Personal Services.............................2,600,00012  For State Contributions to Social Security..........198,90013  For Contractual Services............................208,00014  For Travel..........................................100,00015    Total                                          $3,106,900 16    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 18and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:19DIVISION OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION20Payable from the General Revenue Fund:21  For Personal Services.............................2,300,00022  For State Contribution to Social Security...........176,000  HB3907- 2 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1  For Contractual Services..........................2,035,0002  For Travel...........................................10,0003  For Commodities......................................22,6004  For Printing........................................110,0005  For Equipment........................................19,0006  For Telecommunication Services......................450,0007  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................185,0008    Total                                          $5,307,6009DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS10OPERATIONS11Payable from the General Revenue Fund:12  For the Administrative and13   Programmatic Expenses in Support of the 14   Department on Aging Grants, Fee for Service,15   Contractual Obligations and Intergovernmental16   Agreements, Including Prior Years' Costs...........175,00017Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:18  For Personal Services.............................1,220,00019  For State Contributions to State20   Employees' Retirement System.......................567,20021  For State Contributions to Social Security...........93,30022  For Group Insurance.................................332,00023  For Contractual Services............................225,00024  For Travel...........................................10,00025  For Commodities.......................................3,00026  For Telecommunication Services.......................50,000  HB3907- 3 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................6,0002  For the Administrative and3   Programmatic Expenses of4   Governmental Discretionary Projects..............3,500,0005Payable from the Department on Aging  6 State Projects Fund:7  For the Administrative and8   Programmatic Expenses of Private9   Partnership Projects...............................345,000 10    Section 15. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department on Aging 12Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department on Aging for all 13costs associated with administration and programmatic grant 14activities. 15    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 17and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:18DIVISION OF COMMUNITY SUPPORTIVE SERVICES19Payable from the General Revenue Fund:20  For Personal Services.............................1,090,00021  For State Contributions to Social Security...........83,40022  For Contractual Services.............................80,00023  For Travel..........................................120,00024    Total                                          $1,373,400  HB3907- 4 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS2OPERATIONS3Payable from the General Revenue Fund:4  For the Administrative and5   Programmatic Expenses of the6   Senior Employment Specialist Program...............190,3007  For the Administrative and8   Programmatic Expenses of the9   Senior Employment Program..........................200,00010  For the Administrative and11   Programmatic Expenses of the12   Senior Meal Program (USDA)..........................90,00013Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:14  For Personal Services...............................745,00015  For State Contributions to State16   Employees' Retirement..............................346,40017  For State Contributions to Social Security...........73,50018  For Group Insurance.................................232,40019  For Contractual Services............................700,00020  For Travel..........................................110,00021For the Administrative and22   Programmatic Expenses of the23   Senior Meal Program USDA...........................225,00024  For the Administrative and25   Programmatic Expenses of26   Older Americans Training...........................200,000  HB3907- 5 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1  For the Administrative and2   Programmatic Expenses of3   Governmental Discretionary Projects..............2,000,0004  For the Administrative and5   Programmatic Expenses of6   Title V Services...................................300,0007Payable from the Commitment to Human Services Fund:8  For the Administrative and9   Programmatic Expenses of the10   Home Delivered Meals Program....................63,300,000 11DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS12GRANTS13Payable from the General Revenue Fund:14  For Grandparents Raising15   Grandchildren Program..............................300,00016  For Support of Senior Programming17   Limited by Rural Conditions........................800,00018Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund: 19  For USDA Child and Adult Food20   Care Program, Including Prior Years' Costs.........450,00021  For Title V Employment Services,22   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................4,000,00023  For Title III B Ombudsman,24   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................2,300,00025  For Title III Social Services,  HB3907- 6 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1   Including Prior Years' Costs....................55,000,0002  For USDA National Lunch Program,3    Including Prior Years' Costs....................3,500,0004  For National Family Caregiver5   Support Program, Including Prior Years' Costs...13,000,0006  For Title VII Prevention of Elder7   Abuse, Neglect and Exploitation,8   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................1,800,0009  For Title VII Long-Term Care10   Ombudsman Services for Older Americans,11   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................1,400,00012  For Title III D Preventive Health,13   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................4,500,00014  For Nutrition Services Incentive15   Program, Including Prior Years' Costs...........12,000,00016  For Title III C-1 Congregate17   Meals Program, Including Prior Years' Costs.....35,000,00018  For Title III C-2 Home Delivered19   Meals Program, Including Prior Years' Costs.....45,000,00020Payable from the Commitment to Human Services Fund:21  For Retired Senior Volunteer Program................565,00022  For Planning and Service Grants to23   Area Agencies on Aging..........................17,590,50024  For Intergenerational and25   Foster Grandparents Program........................376,40026  For Equal Distribution of  HB3907- 7 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1   Community Based Services.........................1,751,2002  For Caregiver Support Services....................5,273,8003Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:4  For Senior Health Assistance Programs.............2,800,000 5    Section 25. The sum of $196,688, or so much of that amount 6as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 7business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 8made for such purposes in Article 47, Section 25 of Public Act 9103-0589, as amended is reappropriated from the General 10Revenue Fund to the Department on Aging for costs associated 11with the Grandparents Raising Grandchildren Program. 12    Section 30. The sum of $1,300,000 for administrative and 13programmatic use, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 14appropriated from the Commitment to Human services Fund to the 15Department on Aging for their discretionary use to assist with 16aging service access throughout the State of Illinois. 17    Section 35. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department on Aging 19Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department on Aging for all 20costs associated with administration and programmatic grant 21activities. 22    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much   HB3907- 8 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 2and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:3DIVISION OF COMMUNITY CARE SERVICES4Payable from the General Revenue Fund:5  For Personal Services...............................830,0006  For State Contributions to Social Security...........63,5007  For Contractual Services............................315,0008  For Community Care Services Travel...................65,3009    Total                                          $1,273,80010DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS11OPERATIONS12Payable from the General Revenue Fund:13  For the Administrative and14   Programmatic Expenses of15   Program Development and Training...................400,00016Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:17  For the Administrative and18   Programmatic Expenses of Community19   Care Program Governmental20   Discretionary Projects...........................2,000,00021DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS22GRANTS23Payable from the General Revenue Fund:24  For the Administrative and25   Programmatic Expenses Including26   Grants and Fee For Service Associated  HB3907- 9 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1   with the Purchases of Services2   Covered by the Community Care3   Program, Including Prior Years' Costs..........555,000,0004  For the Administrative and5   Programmatic Expenses of Illinois Care Connections,6   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................3,500,0007Payable from the Commitment to Human Services Fund:8  For Grants, Programmatic and9   Administrative Expenses Associated10   with Comprehensive Case Coordination11   Including Prior Years' Costs....................92,100,00012  For the Administrative and Programmatic13   Expenses Including Grants and Fee14   For Service Associated with the15   Purchases of Services Covered by the16   Community Care Program Including17   Prior Years' Costs...........................1,000,000,000 18    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 20and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:21DIVISION OF AGING CLIENT RIGHTS22DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS23OPERATIONS24Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:25  For the Administrative and  HB3907- 10 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1   Programmatic Expenses of Aging Rights2   Governmental Discretionary Projects.............16,000,0003  For the Expenses of Aging Rights4   Training and Conference Planning...................200,0005Payable from the Commitment to Human Services Fund:6  For the Administrative and7   Programmatic Expenses of8   Adult Protective Services9   Including Prior Years' Costs....................26,374,90010Payable from the Long-term Care Ombudsman Fund:11  For the Administrative and12   Programmatic Expenses of the13   Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program,14   Including Prior Years' Costs....................10,228,800 15    Section 50. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department on Aging 17Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department on Aging for all 18costs associated with administration and programmatic grant 19activities. 20    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 21thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 22and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:23DIVISION OF COMMUNITY OUTREACH24Payable from the General Revenue Fund:  HB3907- 11 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1  For Personal Services...............................773,8002  For State Contributions to Social Security...........59,6003  For Contractual Services.............................25,0004  For Travel...........................................20,0005    Total                                            $878,4006DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS7OPERATIONS8Payable from the General Revenue Fund:9  For the Administrative and10   Programmatic Expenses of Illinois11   Council on Aging....................................10,00012  For the Administrative and13   Programmatic Expenses of14   Senior Community Outreach Events.................1,315,00015  For the Administrative and16   Programmatic Expenses of17   Senior HelpLine..................................4,029,10018Payable from the Senior Health Insurance Program Fund:19  For the Administrative and20   Programmatic Expenses of the21   Senior Health Insurance Program..................2,700,00022Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:23  For the Administrative and24   Programmatic Expenses of25   Governmental Discretionary Projects..............2,500,000   HB3907- 12 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1    Section 60. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department on Aging 3Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department on Aging for all 4costs associated with administration and programmatic grant 5activities. 6    Section 65. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 8and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:9OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY10DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS11OPERATIONS12Payable from the General Revenue Fund:13  For DoIT Electronic Data Processing...............8,505,400 14    Section 70. The sum of $227,141, or so much of that amount 15as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 16business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 17made for such purposes in Article 47, Section 70 of Public Act 18103-0589, as amended is reappropriated from the General 19Revenue Fund to the Department on Aging for a grant to the Age 20Options in Oak Park for operating expenses. 21    Section 75. The sum of $75,000, or so much thereof as may 22be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 23the Department on Aging for a grant to the Senior Services   HB3907- 13 -OMB104 00005 LDO 10005 b1Center of Will County for costs associated with the 2Grandparents Raising Grandchildren Pilot Program. 3    Section 80. The sum of $700,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 5the Department on Aging for costs associated with Multisector 6Planning, including but not limited to ordinary and contingent 7expenses. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.